Arkansas statutes. Title 11 Labor and Industrial Relations
Chapter 10 Division of Workforce Services Law
11-10-523. Board of Review created — Administrative appeal — Claims.

There is created a Board of Review which shall consist of three (3) members.

The members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor for a term of office of four (4) years or until their successors are appointed and qualified. The four-year terms are to run concurrently with the term of the office of the Governor.

A member of the board may be removed by the Governor for cause after hearing.

Vacancies shall be filled by appointment by the Governor for the unexpired term.

The Governor shall designate as Chair of the Board of Review the member selected to represent the public at large.

The chair shall be paid a full-time salary and devote all of his or her time to his or her duties herein prescribed.

The chair shall have a four-year term beginning with the year 2003 appointment.

The other two (2) members of the board are to serve when requested to serve by the chair of the board at his or her own discretion.

If any interested party requests in writing a review by the full board, then the chair shall direct board members to attend and review the matters as requested by the petitioner.

The members of the board other than the chair may receive expense reimbursement and stipends to be paid from the Employment Security Administration Fund in accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

The chair shall appoint some competent person as an examiner and reporter for the board. That person shall have authority under the direction of the chair of the board to:

Hold hearings on appeals and take testimony and submit it to the chair with recommendations, which question shall be determined by the chair. The person, when holding hearings under the direction of the chair, shall have the same authority as the chair or members of the board, except that he or she shall not have the authority to render any decision therein;

Take and transcribe all testimony taken either before the examiner, the chair, or the board; and

Act as secretary for the board.

The members of the board shall be selected as follows:

One (1) member shall be, because of his or her vocation, occupation, or affiliation, deemed to be representative of employers;

One (1) member shall be, because of his or her vocation, occupation, or affiliation, deemed to be representative of employees; and

The chair shall be a licensed practicing attorney who, because of his or her vocation, occupation, or affiliation, is deemed not to be representative of employers or employees.

All members shall be selected without regard to § 11-10-310.

The examiner and reporter shall be selected in accordance with the merit system provided for in § 11-10-310.

The chair, the members, and the examiner and reporter, as provided for above, shall all receive their actual and necessary expenses incurred, in accordance with the rules of the Division of Workforce Services.

To hear and decide appeal claims, the board created by this section shall appoint one (1) or more impartial appeal tribunals.

Each tribunal shall consist of either a hearing officer selected in accordance with § 11-10-310 or a body consisting of three (3) members, one (1) of whom shall be a representative of employers and the other of whom shall be a representative of employees.

Each of the latter two (2) members may be selected without regard to § 11-10-310, shall serve at the pleasure of the board, and may be paid a fee of not more than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per day of active service on such tribunal plus necessary expenses and shall be paid from the Employment Security Administration Fund.

The board shall designate alternates to serve in the absence or disqualification of any member of an appeal tribunal.

The chair shall act alone in the absence or disqualification of any other member or his or her alternates. In no case shall the hearing proceed unless the chair of the appeal tribunal is present.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall provide the board and appeal tribunals with proper facilities and assistance for the execution of their functions.

The appeal hearing officer, as such, shall have all power bestowed on him or her as chair of the appeals tribunal.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1943, No. 138, § 3; 1943, No. 263, § 2; 1947, No. 398, § 5; 1953, No. 162, § 7; 1975, No. 609, § 4; 1985, No. 8, § 7; 1985, No. 9, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 1991, No. 100, §§ 30, 31; 1995, No. 519, § 6; 1997, No. 234, § 15; 1997, No. 250, § 61; 2001, No. 1467, §§ 3-6; 2019, No. 315, § 823; 2019, No. 910, §§ 253, 254.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Pursuant to § 1-2-207, this section is set out above as amended by Acts 1997, No. 250. Subdivision (c)(2) of this section was also amended by Acts 1997, No. 234 to read as follows:

“(c)(2)

The members of the board other than the chairman shall be paid in accordance with Section 25-16-905 when attending meetings in connection with their duties as members and shall be reimbursed for any travel or other expense incurred in accordance with the travel regulations applicable to the employees of the Arkansas Employment Security Department.”

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (f).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (f); and substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (g)(2)(C).

Cross References.

Employment Security Administration Fund, § 11-10-320.

Compensation of State Boards, § 25-16-901 et seq.

11-10-524. Claims — Administrative appeal — Filing and hearing.

The claimant, the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, or any other party entitled to notice may appeal a determination made by the agency by filing a written notice of appeal with the appeal tribunal or at any office of the Division of Workforce Services within twenty (20) calendar days after the date of mailing the notice to his or her last known address, or if the notice is not mailed, within twenty (20) calendar days after the date of delivery of the notice. If mailed, an appeal shall be considered to have been filed as of the date of the postmark on the envelope.

However, if it is determined by the appeal tribunal or the Board of Review that the appeal is not perfected within the twenty-calendar-day period as a result of circumstances beyond the appellant's control, the appeal may be considered as having been filed timely.

Unless the appeal is withdrawn with its permission or is removed to the board, the appeal tribunal, after affording the parties a reasonable opportunity for a fair hearing, and on the basis of the record, shall affirm, modify, reverse, dismiss, or remand the determination.

However, whenever an appeal involves a question as to whether services were performed by a claimant in employment or for an employing unit, the appeal tribunal shall give special notice of the issue and of the pendency of the appeal to the employing unit and to the director, both of whom shall be parties to the proceedings and be afforded a reasonable opportunity to present evidence bearing on the question in issue.

The appeal tribunal shall grant upon request from any interested party in an intrastate claim an in-person hearing.

The parties shall be promptly notified of the tribunal's decision and shall be furnished a copy of the decision and the findings and conclusions in support thereof.

The decision shall become final unless within twenty (20) calendar days after the date of mailing the notice to the parties' last known addresses an appeal is initiated pursuant to § 11-10-525 or a request for reopening is made pursuant to subsection (d) of this section.

If any party fails to appear at the initial tribunal hearing scheduled as a result of an appeal, that party may request that the matter be reopened by the tribunal.

Requests for reopening shall be made in writing and shall be granted by the tribunal only upon a showing of good cause for failing to appear at the initial tribunal hearing.

If a request for reopening is granted, the tribunal shall schedule another hearing, after which it will issue a new decision.

If a request for reopening is not granted, the tribunal's initial decision shall stand as issued.

In either event, the parties shall be promptly notified of the tribunal's decision and shall be furnished a copy of the decision and the findings and conclusions in support thereof.

The decision shall become final unless within twenty (20) calendar days after the date of its mailing to the parties' last known addresses an appeal is initiated pursuant to § 11-10-525.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1943, No. 138, § 4; 1953, No. 162, § 6; 1975, No. 609, § 5; 1983, No. 482, §§ 22, 37, 38; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 1991, No. 48, § 5; 1991, No. 100, § 32; 1993, No. 6, § 9; 1997, No. 234, §§ 16-18; 2003, No. 1223, §§ 8, 9; 2009, No. 802, § 6; 2019, No. 910, § 255.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Prior to the 2003 amendment, this section contained a subdivision (d)(1)(B), which read, “No other request for reopening shall be considered by the tribunal.” Subdivision (d)(1)(B) was neither set out nor specifically deleted in the 2003 amendment. Subdivision (d)(1)(A) has been renumbered as (d)(1) in order to conform with Code style.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” twice in (a)(1); and deleted “of the department” following “Board of Review” in (a)(2).

11-10-525. Claims — Administrative appeal — Review by Board of Review.

An appeal filed by any party shall be allowed as of right if the determination was not affirmed by the appeal tribunal.

The Board of Review, on its own motion and within the time specified in § 11-10-524, may initiate a review of the decision of an appeal tribunal or determination of a special examiner or may allow an appeal from the decision on application filed within the time by any party entitled to notice of the decision.

Upon review on its own motion or upon appeal and on the basis of evidence previously submitted in the case, or upon the basis of any additional evidence as it may direct be taken, the board may affirm, modify, reverse, dismiss, or remand the case.

In cases where the board directs that additional evidence be taken in an appeal involving an intrastate claim, an in-person hearing shall be granted if requested by any interested party.

The board shall promptly notify the parties to any proceeding before it of its decision, including its findings and conclusions in support of the decision.

The decision shall be final unless within thirty (30) calendar days after the mailing of notice thereof to the parties' last known address or in the absence of the mailing, within thirty (30) calendar days after the delivery of the notice, a proceeding for judicial review is initiated pursuant to § 11-10-529.

However, upon denial by the board of an application for appeal from the decision of an appeal tribunal, the decision of the appeal tribunal shall be deemed to be a decision of the board within the meaning of this section for purposes of judicial review and shall be subject to judicial review within the time and in the manner provided for with respect to decisions of the board, except that the time for initiating the review shall run from the date of notice of the order of the board denying the application for appeal.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1943, No. 138, § 5; 1953, No. 162, § 9; 1983, No. 482, § 23; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 1999, No. 1116, § 12; 2003, No. 1223, § 10; 2007, No. 490, § 8; 2009, No. 802, § 7.

11-10-526. Claims — Administrative appeal — Procedure.

The Board of Review, appeal tribunal, and special examiners shall not be bound by common law or statutory rules of evidence or by technical rules of procedure, but any hearing or appeal before the tribunals shall be conducted in such manner as to ascertain the substantial rights of the parties.

In like manner as provided at § 11-10-307(a) for the adopting, amending, or rescinding of general rules by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, the board may adopt reasonable rules governing the manner of filing appeals, the conduct of hearings, and other appellate procedures, consistent with this chapter.

Hearings on appeals before an appeals tribunal or before the board shall not be held sooner than five (5) days from the date of the mailing of notice thereof to the parties to the appeal.

When the same or substantially similar evidence is relevant and material to the matters in issue in claims by more than one (1) individual or in claims by a single individual with respect to two (2) or more weeks of unemployment, the same time and place for considering each claim may be fixed, hearings jointly conducted, a single record of the proceedings made, and evidence introduced with respect to one (1) proceeding considered as introduced in the others, provided that in the judgment of the examiner or tribunal having jurisdiction of the proceeding, consolidation would not be prejudicial to any party.

No person shall participate on behalf of the director or the board in any case in which he or she has a direct or indirect interest.

A record shall be kept of all testimony and proceedings before special examiners or in connection with an appeal, but the testimony need not be transcribed unless further review is initiated.

Witnesses subpoenaed pursuant to §§ 11-10-520 — 11-10-532 shall be allowed fees at a rate fixed by the director, and fees of witnesses subpoenaed on behalf of the director or any claimant shall be deemed part of the expense of administering this chapter.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1943, No. 138, § 6; 1983, No. 482, § 24; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 1997, No. 234, § 19; 2009, No. 802, § 8; 2019, No. 315, § 824; 2019, No. 910, §
256.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (a)(2).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(2).

Formal Rules.

Although the appeals referee asked a great number of very leading questions, and in some instances came close to putting words in the mouth of the claimant while she was testifying and the Board of Review adopted the findings and decision of the referee as its own, the actions did not require a reversal since neither the referee nor the Board of Review were bound by the statutory rules of evidence or by the technical rules of procedure. Stagecoach Motel v. Krause, 267 Ark. 1093, 593 S.W.2d 495 (Ct. App. 1980).

The parties before the Board of Review are not required to formally object or proffer evidence to preserve a record for appeal purposes, since such a requirement would impose a duty contrary to that envisioned by the General Assembly when it enacted this section. Smith v. Everett, 6 Ark. App. 337, 642 S.W.2d 320 (1982). But see Fry v. Director of Labor, 16 Ark. App. 204, 698 S.W.2d 816 (1985).

Neither the appeal tribunal nor the Board of Review is bound by common law or statutory rules of evidence. Haynes v. Director of Labor, 19 Ark. App. 71, 719 S.W.2d 437 (1986).

11-10-527. Claims — Conclusiveness of determinations and decisions.

Except insofar as reconsideration of any determination is had under the provisions of § 11-10-522, any right, fact, or matter in issue, directly passed upon or necessarily involved in a determination or redetermination that has become final, or in a decision on appeal under §§ 11-10-523 — 11-10-530 that has become final, shall be conclusive for all the purposes of this chapter as between the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, the claimant, and all employing units who had notice of the determination, redetermination, or decision.

Subject to appeal proceedings and judicial review as provided in §§ 11-10-520 — 11-10-532, any determination, redetermination, or decision as to rights to benefits shall be conclusive for all the purposes of this chapter and shall not be subject to collateral attack by any employing unit, irrespective of notice.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 257.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-528. Claims — Administrative appeal — Rule of decision.

The final decisions of the Board of Review or of an appeal tribunal, and the principles of law declared by it in arriving at the decisions, unless expressly or impliedly overruled by a later decision of the board or by a court of competent jurisdiction, shall be binding upon the Director of the Division of Workforce Services and any examiner or appeal tribunal in subsequent proceedings which involve similar questions of law.

However, if in connection with any subsequent proceeding, the director, an examiner, or appeal tribunal has serious doubt as to the correctness of any principle so declared, then they may certify their findings of fact in the case, together with the question of law involved, to the board.

After giving notice and reasonable opportunity for hearing upon the law to all parties to the proceedings, the board shall certify to the director, the examiner, or appeal tribunal and the parties its answer to the question submitted.

If the question thus certified to the board arises in connection with a claim for benefits, the board in its discretion may remove to itself the entire proceedings on the claim. After proceeding in accordance with the requirements of §§ 11-10-523 — 11-10-530 with respect to proceedings before an appeal tribunal, the board shall render its decision upon the entire claim.

Any decision made under this section after removal of the proceeding upon a claim to the board shall have the effect of a decision under § 11-10-525 and shall be subject to judicial review within the same time and to the same extent.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1943, No. 138, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 258.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-529. Claims — Decision of Board of Review — Judicial review.

Any party entitled to a decision of the Board of Review shall have thirty (30) calendar days from the date the decision is mailed to his or her last known address in which to request a judicial review by filing in the Court of Appeals a petition for review of the decision, and in the proceedings any other party to the proceeding before the board shall be made a party respondent.

If mailed, a petition for review shall be considered filed as of the date of the postmark on the envelope.

In the event of a nonexistent or illegible postmark, the Clerk of the Court of Appeals shall notify the appellant by mail.

The appellant shall then have ten (10) calendar days from the posted mailing date of the clerk's notification letter to provide the court proof of timely mailing of the request for judicial review by producing a delivery confirmation or a certified mail return receipt document bearing evidence of the accurate post date.

The petition for review need not be verified but shall state the grounds upon which the review is sought.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services is made a party to the proceedings.

The petition shall be served upon the director by leaving with him or her, or such representative as he or she may designate for that purpose, as many copies of the petition as there are respondents.

With his or her answer or petition, the director shall file with the court a certified copy of the record of the case, including all documents and papers and a transcript of all testimony taken in the matter, together with the board's findings, conclusions, and decision.

The record shall be certified by the Chair of the Board of Review.

Upon the filing of a petition for review by the director or upon the service of the petition on him or her, the director shall forthwith send by mail to each of the parties to the proceeding a copy of the petition.

The mailing shall be deemed to be completed service upon all such parties.

In any proceeding under §§ 11-10-523 — 11-10-530, the findings of the board as to the facts, if supported by evidence and in the absence of fraud, shall be conclusive and the jurisdiction of the court shall be confined to questions of law.

No additional evidence shall be received by the court, but the court may order additional evidence to be taken before the board.

The board may, after hearing the additional evidence, modify its findings of fact or conclusions and file the additional or modified findings and conclusions, together with a certified transcript of the additional record, with the clerk.

The proceedings shall be heard in a summary manner and shall be given precedence over all other civil cases except cases arising under the Workers' Compensation Law, § 11-9-101 et seq.

It shall not be necessary as a condition precedent to judicial review of any decision of the board to enter exceptions to the rulings of the board.

No bond shall be required as a condition of initiating a proceeding for judicial review or entering an appeal from the decision of the court upon the review.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1943, No. 138, § 8; 1953, No. 162, § 10; 1979, No. 252, § 2; 1981, No. 43, § 9; 1983, No. 482, § 38; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 1997, No. 234, § 20; 2003, No. 1223, § 11; 2013, No. 956, § 2; 2019, No. 910, § 259.

Amendments.

The 2013 amendment deleted “certified” preceding “mail” in (b)(2)(A).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(2)(B).

11-10-530. Claims — Administrative appeal — Representation.

The Director of the Division of Workforce Services shall be a party entitled to notice in any proceeding involving a claim for benefits before a special examiner, an appeal tribunal, or the Board of Review.

In any proceeding for judicial review pursuant to § 11-10-529, the director may be represented by any qualified attorney employed by the director and designated by him or her for that purpose, or at the director's request by the Attorney General.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1943, No. 138, § 9; 1953, No. 162, §§ 4-10; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 260.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-531. Claims — Payment of benefits.

Benefits shall be paid promptly in accordance with an initial determination or redetermination that the benefits are due or in accordance with a subsequent decision by any appellate tribunal, board, or court that the benefits are due.

The pendency of an appeal shall not of itself suspend or stay the payment of benefits once they have been determined to be due.

Benefits determined to be due shall remain payable during any appeal until the determination has been modified or reversed by a subsequent decision or redetermination, in which case payment of benefits shall be suspended until such time as benefits might later be determined or decided to be due.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1943, No. 138, § 10; 1972 (Ex. Sess.), No. 58, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107.

11-10-532. Claims — Recovery.

If the Director of the Division of Workforce Services finds that a person knowingly has made a false statement or misrepresentation of a material fact or knowingly has failed to disclose a material fact and as a result of either action has received benefits under this chapter to which he or she was not entitled, then he or she is liable to repay the amount to the Unemployment Compensation Fund.

Once the overpayment becomes final under § 11-10-527, the amount owed shall accrue interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) per annum beginning thirty (30) days after the date of the first billing statement.

A penalty of fifty percent (50%) of the amount of the overpayment at the time the overpayment becomes final shall be assessed on all fraudulent overpayments.

An overpayment established under this subsection that is repaid within thirty (30) days of the mailing date of the determination shall be assessed a reduced penalty of fifteen percent (15%).

An overpayment established under this subsection that is determined to have been as a result of benefits collected fraudulently, as well as any other penalties, interest, and costs assessed as a result of the fraudulent activity, shall be repaid before the person receives benefits under this chapter.

The portion of the penalty assessed under subdivision (a)(3)(A) of this section in excess of fifteen percent (15%) of the overpayment shall be deposited into a subaccount of the Division of Workforce Services Special Fund under § 19-5-984, to be entitled the “UI Integrity Fund” that shall be used exclusively for integrity-related activities arising under this chapter.

If the director finds that a person has received an amount as benefits under this chapter to which he or she was not entitled by reasons other than fraud, willful misrepresentation, or willful nondisclosure of facts, the person is liable to repay the amount to the Unemployment Compensation Fund.

In lieu of requiring the repayment, the director may recover the amount by deduction of any future benefits payable to the person under this chapter unless the director finds that the overpayment was received as a direct result of an error by the Division of Workforce Services and that its recovery would be against equity and good conscience.

As used in subdivision (b)(2)(A) of this section, “direct result of an error by the Division of Workforce Services” does not include overpayments established under an appeal reversal as a result of the successful appeal of a denial of benefits.

A person held liable to repay an amount to the Unemployment Compensation Fund is subject to having any state income tax refund to which he or she may be entitled intercepted pursuant to § 26-36-301 et seq., as administered by the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration.

When an overpayment becomes final under § 11-10-527, the director shall present a certificate of overpayment describing the amount owed by the claimant to the circuit clerk of the county where the claimant is domiciled.

The circuit clerk shall enter the certificate of overpayment in the docket of the circuit court for judgments and decrees and note the time of the filing of the certificate.

After entry by the circuit clerk, the certificate of overpayment shall have the force of a judgment of the circuit court and shall bear interest at the rate of ten percent (10%) annually.

An interest payment recovered from an overpayment to a claimant shall be deposited into the Division of Workforce Services Special Fund.

A penalty payment recovered from an overpayment to a claimant shall be deposited into the Unemployment Compensation Fund.

The federal income tax refund of a person held liable to repay an amount to the Unemployment Compensation Fund is subject to interception under the Claims Resolution Act of 2010, Pub. L. No. 111-291, or a regulation adopted to implement that law.

The Division of Workforce Services may issue an overpayment determination contemporaneously with any other determination.

The deductions from future benefits provided for in subdivisions (a)(1) and (b)(2) of this section may proceed during an appeal of the overpayment determination.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 391, § 6; 1963, No. 93, § 8; 1981, No. 43, § 10; 1985, No. 8, § 7; 1985, No. 9, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1107; Acts 1987, No. 753, § 16; 1993, No. 6, § 10; 1997, No. 234, § 21; 1999, No. 1116, §§ 13, 14; 2001, No. 1367, § 8; 2005, No. 902, § 7; 2007, No. 490, § 9; 2009, No. 802, §§ 9-11; 2011, No. 1040, § 3; 2013, No. 956, § 3; 2019, No. 453, §§ 9, 10; 2019, No. 910, §§ 261-263.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment, in (e), substituted “is subject” for “as the result of a finding of fraud shall be subject” and “under Pub. L. No. 111-291” for “pursuant to Pub. L. No. 110-328,” and deleted “or regulation” following “rule.”

The 2013 amendment substituted “Unemployment Compensation Fund” for “fund” in (b)(1), (c), and (e); rewrote (a)(1), (a)(3), and (e); substituted “An interest” for “Any interest or penalty” in (d)(4); and inserted (d)(5), (f), and (g).

The 2019 amendment by No. 453 deleted “or the director may recover the amount of the overpayment by deductions from any future benefits payable to the person under this chapter” from the end of (a)(1); redesignated (a)(3) as (a)(3)(A)(i); substituted “fifty percent (50%)” for “fifteen percent (15%)” in (a)(3)(A)(i); added (a)(3)(A)(ii), (a)(3)(B), and (a)(3)(C); redesignated (b)(2) as (b)(2)(A); substituted “as a direct result of an error by the Division of Workforce Services” for “without fault on the part of the recipient” in (b)(2)(A); added (b)(2)(B); and made a stylistic change.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (a)(1); substituted “Division of Workforce Services Special Fund” for “Department of Workforce Services Special Fund” in (d)(4); and substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (f).

Effective Dates.

Acts 2019, No. 453, § 11: Oct. 1, 2019.

11-10-533. Claims — Investigation of claims filed by state employees.

The Division of Workforce Services shall investigate all claims for benefits filed by state employees whether or not the employing state agency lodges a protest to the payment of the benefits.

The investigation shall result in a determination of the eligibility of the employee for payment of benefits.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 925, § 3; 1991, No. 100, § 33; 2019, No. 910, § 264.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Workforce Services” for “Department of Workforce Services” in (a).

11-10-534. Extended benefits — Definitions.

As used in this section and §§ 11-10-535 — 11-10-543, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

“Additional benefits” means benefits payable to exhaustees by reason of conditions of high unemployment or by reason of other special factors under the provisions of any state law;

“Eligibility period” of an individual means the period consisting of the weeks in his or her benefit year which begin in an extended benefit period and, if his or her benefit year ends within that extended benefit period, any weeks thereafter which begin in that period;

“Exhaustee” means an individual who, with respect to any week of unemployment in his or her eligibility period:

Has received, prior to that week, all of the regular benefits that were available to him or her under this chapter or any other state law, including dependents' allowances and benefits payable to federal civilian employees and ex-service personnel under 5 U.S.C. § 8501 et seq. in his or her current benefit year that includes that week.

For the purposes of this subdivision (3)(A), an individual shall be deemed to have received all of the regular benefits that were available to him or her although:

As a result of a pending appeal with respect to wages that were not considered in the original monetary determination in his or her benefit year, he or she may subsequently be determined to be entitled to added regular benefits; or

He or she may be entitled to regular benefits with respect to future weeks of unemployment, but benefits are not payable with respect to such week of unemployment by reason of the provisions of § 11-10-506 or the parallel provisions of any other state law;

His or her benefit year having expired prior to such week, he or she has no wages or insufficient wages on the basis of which he or she could establish a new benefit year that would include that week or, having established a benefit year, no regular compensation is payable to him or her during that year because his or her wage credits were cancelled or his or her right to regular compensation was totally reduced as a result of the application of disqualification;

Has no right to unemployment benefits or allowances, as the case may be, under the Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act, the Trade Expansion Act of 1962, the Automotive Products Trade Act of 1965, and such other federal laws as are specified in regulations issued by the United States Secretary of Labor; and

Has not received and is not seeking unemployment benefits under the unemployment compensation law of the Virgin Islands or of Canada. If he or she is seeking benefits and the appropriate agency finally determines that he or she is not entitled to benefits under law, he or she is considered an exhaustee. However, this provision shall not be applicable to individuals seeking benefits under the unemployment compensation laws of the Virgin Islands on and after the date the Virgin Islands meets the definition of a state as set forth in § 11-10-213;

“Extended benefit period” means a period that:

Begins with the third week after the first week for which there is a state “on” indicator; and

Ends with:

The third week after the first week for which there is a state “off” indicator; or

The thirteenth consecutive week of such period;

Provided that no extended benefit period may begin before the fourteenth week following the end of a prior extended benefit period which was in effect with respect to this state;

“Extended benefits” means benefits, including benefits payable to federal civilian employees and to ex-service personnel pursuant to 5 U.S.C. § 8501 et seq. payable to an individual under the provisions of this section for weeks of unemployment in his or her eligibility period;

There is a state “off” indicator for a week if, for the period consisting of that week and the immediately preceding twelve (12) weeks, either subdivision (7)(A) or subdivision (7)(B) of this section was not satisfied;

There is a state “on” indicator for a week if the rate of insured unemployment under this chapter for the period consisting of such week and the immediately preceding twelve (12) weeks:

Equalled or exceeded one hundred twenty percent (120%) of the average of such rates for the corresponding thirteen-week period ending in each of the preceding two (2) calendar years; and

Equalled or exceeded four percent (4%), provided that for periods beginning on and after September 25, 1982, such rate equalled or exceeded five percent (5%); except that effective July 1, 1991, the rate of insured unemployment equalled or exceeded six percent (6%) even though the provisions of subdivision (7)(A) of this section were not met;

“Rate of insured unemployment”, for purposes of subdivision (7) of this section, means the percentage derived by dividing:

The average weekly number of individuals filing claims for regular benefits in this state for weeks of unemployment with respect to the most recent thirteen (13) consecutive week period, as determined by the Director of the Division of Workforce Services on the basis of his or her reports to the United States Secretary of Labor; by

The average monthly employment covered under this chapter for the first four (4) of the most recent six (6) completed calendar quarters ending before the end of such thirteen-week period; and

“State law” means the unemployment insurance law of any state, approved by the United States Secretary of Labor under section 3304 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21; 1973, No. 350, §§ 5-7; 1975, No. 609, §§ 13-15; 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1083, § 11; 1977, No. 376, §§ 17, 18; 1979, No. 492, § 15; 1979, No. 922, § 15; 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, §§ 3-5; 1983, No. 482, § 35; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1124; reen. Acts 1987, No. 672, § 10; 1991, No. 48, § 6;
2019, No. 910, § 265.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Part of this section was reenacted by Acts 1987, No. 672, § 10. Acts 1987, No. 834 provided that 1987 legislation reenacting acts passed in the 1976 Extended Session should not repeal any other 1987 legislation and that such other legislation would be controlling in the event of conflict.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1977, No. 366, § 11, which amended Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21, provided that, except as may be provided otherwise, the provisions of this section should become effective on and after July 1, 1971.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in (8)(A).

U.S. Code.

The Railroad Unemployment Insurance Act referred to in this section is codified as 45 U.S.C. § 351 et seq. The Trade Expansion Act of 1962 is codified as 19 U.S.C. § 1801 et seq. The Automotive Products Trade Act of 1965 is codified as 19 U.S.C. § 2001 et seq.Section 3304 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1954 is codified as 26 U.S.C. § 3304.

11-10-535. Extended benefits — Effect of provisions relating to regular benefits.

Except when the result would be inconsistent with the other provisions of this section, as provided in the rules of the Director of the Division of Workforce Services, the provisions of this chapter which apply to claims for, or the payment of, regular benefits shall apply to claims for, and the payment of, extended benefits.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1124; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 825; 2019, No. 910, §
266.

Publisher's Notes.

As to effective date of this section, see Publisher's Notes, § 11-10-534.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations”.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services”.

11-10-536. Extended benefits — Eligibility.

An individual shall be eligible to receive extended benefits with respect to any week of unemployment in his or her eligibility period only if the Director of the Division of Workforce Services finds that with respect to that week:

He or she is an exhaustee as defined in § 11-10-534(3);

He or she has satisfied the requirements of §§ 11-10-534 — 11-10-543 for the receipt of regular benefits that are applicable to individuals claiming extended benefits, including not being subject to a disqualification for the receipt of benefits; and

He or she was paid wages that exceeded forty (40) times his or her weekly benefit amount during the base period that established his or her last benefit year for the receipt of regular benefits;

He or she has one and one-half (1½) times his or her insured wages in the calendar quarter of the base period in which his or her insured wages were the highest; or

He or she has provided evidence of twenty (20) weeks of full-time insured employment in the base period that served as the basis for his or her extended benefits claim.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 35, § 21; 1981 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 37, § 6; 1983, No. 482, §§ 35, 36; A.S.A. 1947, § 81-1124; Acts 1993, No. 6, § 11; 2019, No. 910, § 267.

Publisher's Notes.

As to effective date of this section, see Publisher's Notes, § 11-10-534.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “Director of the Division of Workforce Services” for “Director of the Department of Workforce Services” in the introductory language of the section.